California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the public utility for those services during the preceding payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 560, Sec. 4.   (SB 120)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.1.

(a) If a public utility furnishes light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants through a master meter in a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or permanent residential structures in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the structure or park is listed by the public utility as the customer of record, the public utility shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of a written notice posted on the door of each residential unit at least 15 days prior to termination, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated on a date specified in the notice. If it is not reasonable or practicable to post the notice on the door of each residential unit,
 the public utility shall post two copies of the notice in each accessible common area and at each point of access to the structure or structures. The notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become utility customers, to whom the service will then be billed, without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice also shall specify, in plain language, what the residential occupants are required to do in order to prevent the termination of, or to reestablish service; the estimated monthly cost of service; the title, address, and telephone number of a representative of the public utility who can assist the residential occupants in continuing service; and the address and telephone number of a qualified legal services project, as defined in Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code, which has been recommended by the local county bar association. The notice shall be in English and the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(b) The public utility is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant or a representative of the residential occupants agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirements of law and the public utility’s rules. However, if one or more of the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the public utility, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the public utility, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the public utility’s rules or for whom the representative of the residential occupants is not responsible, the public utility shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements or on whose behalf those requirements have been
 met.

(c) If prior service for a period of time or other demonstration of credit worthiness is a condition for establishing credit with the public utility, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation during that period of time acceptable to the public utility is a satisfactory equivalent.

(d) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the public utility pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are not separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the public utility for those services during the preceding payment period.

(e) If a public utility furnishes residential service subject to subdivision (a), the
 public utility may not terminate that service in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the public utility of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) If the customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) For an indebtedness owed by the customer to any other public agency or when the obligation represented by the delinquent account or other indebtedness was incurred with any public agency other than the public utility.

(4) If a delinquent account relates to another property owned, managed, or operated by the customer.

(5) If a public health or building officer certifies that termination would result in a significant
 threat to the health or safety of the residential occupants or the public.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit is occupied, the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants related to restoration of service.

(2) Actual damages related to the termination of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the residential occupants, the
 representative of the residential occupants, or each of them, incurred in the enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit receiving that service is occupied, the corporation may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Delinquent charges accruing prior to the expiration of the notice prescribed by subdivision (a).

(2) Reasonable costs incurred by the corporation related to the restoration of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the
 corporation incurred in the enforcement of this section or in the collection of delinquent charges, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

If the court finds that the owner, manager, or operator has paid the amount in arrears prior to termination, the court shall allow no recovery of any charges, costs, damages, expenses, or fees under this subdivision from the owner, manager, or operator.

An abstract of any money judgment entered pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of this section shall be recorded pursuant to Section 697.310 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) No termination of service subject to this section may be effected without compliance with this section, and any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge to the residential occupants or customer for the restoration of the service. In the event of a wrongful
 termination by the public utility, the public utility shall, in addition, be liable to the residential occupants or customer for actual damages resulting from the termination and for the costs of enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney’s fees, if the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants make a good faith effort to have the service continued without interruption.

(i) The public utility shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section and shall liberally construe this section to accomplish its purpose of ensuring that service to residential occupants is not terminated due to nonpayment by the customer unless the public utility has made every reasonable effort to continue service to the residential occupants. The rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to, guidelines for assistance to actual users in the enforcement of this section and
 requirements for the notice prescribed by subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, clear wording, large and boldface type, and comprehensive instructions to ensure full notice to the actual user.

(j) Nothing in this section broadens or restricts any authority of a local agency that existed prior to January 1, 1989, to adopt an ordinance protecting a residential occupant from the involuntary termination of residential public utility service.

(k) This section preempts any statute or ordinance permitting punitive damages against any owner, manager, or operator on account of an involuntary termination of residential public utility service or permitting the recovery of costs associated with the formation, maintenance, and termination of a tenants’ association.

(l) For purposes of this section, “representative of
 the residential occupants” does not include a tenants’ association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 205.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.6.

(a) The decision of a public utility to require a new residential applicant to deposit a sum of money with the public utility prior to establishing an account and furnishing service shall be based solely upon the creditworthiness of the applicant as determined by the public utility.

(b) No municipal corporation owning or operating a public utility furnishing services for residential use to a tenant under an account established by the tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of services to, or for the tenant’s residential use from, any subsequent tenant or the property owner due to nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. For this purpose, the term “subsequent tenant” shall not include any adult person who lived at the residence during the period that the charges or penalties accrued. The municipal corporation may collect a deposit from the tenant service applicant prior to establishing an account for the tenant. The municipal corporation may not require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner unless the property owner voluntarily agrees to that requirement, nor may the municipal corporation refuse to furnish services to a tenant in the tenant’s name based upon the nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant.

(c) A public utility subject to this section may not demand or receive security in an amount that exceeds twice the estimated average periodic bill or three times the estimated average monthly bill.

(d) In the event of tenant nonpayment of all or a portion of the bill, the deposit shall be applied to the final bill issued when service is terminated.

(e) This section shall not apply to master-metered apartment buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

(a) No public utility furnishing light, water, power, or heat may terminate residential service for nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the public utility first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, as provided in Section 10010.1.

(b) No public utility shall terminate residential service for nonpayment in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the public utility of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) When a customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) On the certification of a licensed physician and surgeon that to do so will be life threatening to the customer and the customer is financially unable to pay for service within the normal payment period and is willing to enter into an amortization agreement with the public utility pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to all charges that the customer is unable to pay prior to delinquency. 

(c) Any residential customer who has initiated a complaint or requested an investigation within five days of receiving the disputed bill, or who has, within 13 days of mailing of the notice required by subdivision (a), made a request for extension of the payment period of a bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay in full during the normal period for payment, shall be given an opportunity for review of the complaint, investigation, or request by a review manager of the public utility. The review shall include consideration of whether the customer shall be permitted to amortize the unpaid balance of the account over a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 12 months. No termination of service shall be effected for any customer complying with the amortization agreement, if the customer also keeps the account current as charges accrue in each subsequent billing period.

(d) Any customer whose complaint or request for an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) has resulted in an adverse determination by the public utility may appeal the determination to the governing body of the municipal corporation. Any subsequent appeal of the dispute or complaint to the governing body is not subject to this section.

(e) Any customer meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall, upon request, be permitted to amortize, over a period not to exceed 12 months, the unpaid balance of any bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay within the normal period for payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 888, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.1.

(a) A public utility furnishing light, heat, water, or power shall not terminate residential service on account of nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the public utility first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, at least 10 days prior to the proposed termination, by means of a notice mailed, postage prepaid, to the customer to whom the service is billed, not earlier than 19 days from the date of mailing the public utility’s bill for services, and the 10-day period shall not commence until five days after the mailing of the notice.

(b) Every public utility shall make a reasonable attempt to contact an adult person residing at the premises of the customer by telephone or personal contact, at least
 24 hours prior to any termination of service, except that, whenever telephone or personal contact cannot be accomplished, the public utility shall give, by mail, in person, or by posting in a conspicuous location at the premises, a notice of termination of service, at least 48 hours prior to termination.

(c) Every public utility shall make available to its residential customers who are 65 years of age or older, or who are dependent adults as defined in Section 15610.23 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a third-party notification service, whereby the public utility will attempt to notify a person designated by the customer to receive notification when the customer’s account is past due and subject to termination. The notification shall include information on what is required to prevent termination of service. The residential customer shall make a request for third-party notification on a form provided by the public utility, and shall include
 the written consent of the designated third party. The third-party notification does not obligate the third party to pay the overdue charges, nor shall it prevent or delay termination of service.

(d) Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the customer whose account is delinquent.

(2) The amount of the delinquency.

(3) The date by which payment or arrangements for payment is required in order to avoid termination.

(4) The procedure by which the customer may initiate a complaint or request an investigation concerning service or charges, except that, if the bill for service contains a
 description of that procedure, the notice pursuant to subdivision (a) is not required to contain that information.

(5) The procedure by which the customer may request amortization of the unpaid charges.

(6) The procedure for the customer to obtain information on the availability of financial assistance, including private, local, state, or federal sources, if applicable.

(7) The telephone number of a representative of the public utility who can provide additional information or institute arrangements for payment.

Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include the items of information in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (6), and (7).

All written notices shall be in a clear and legible format.

(e) If a residential customer fails to comply with an amortization agreement, the public utility shall not terminate service without giving notice to the customer at least 48 hours prior to termination of the conditions the customer is required to meet to avoid termination, but the notice does not entitle the customer to further investigation by the public utility.

(f) A termination of service shall not be effected without compliance with this section. Any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge for the restoration of service, and a notation thereof shall be mailed to the customer at the customer’s billing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 250.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.

No electrical, gas, heat, or water public utility shall, by reason of delinquency in payment for any electric, gas, heat, or water services, cause cessation of any such services on any Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or at any time during which the business offices of the public utility are not open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.5.

Whenever a business transaction of a public utility, as defined in Section 10001, furnishing electricity, gas, water service where the utility has 10,000 or more service connections, or telephone service is such that a personal appearance by a person is required by the utility and the person is unable to appear at the utility’s place of business during the utility’s usual business hours, then the utility shall provide a reasonable and convenient alternative to the person such as an appointment outside the utility’s usual business hours or allowing the person to conduct the transaction by telephone, mail, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 614, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10012.

Every public utility shall comply with Section 8029.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10013.

(a) Subsequent to signing a contingent franchise, license, or service agreement with a local agency, a privatizer shall apply to the commission for a determination that the proposed privatization project is not a public utility within the meaning of Section 216 and is therefore exempt from commission regulation. When a privatizer files an application with the commission, the privatizer shall include the information the commission requires to make a determination in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e).

(b) (1) Not later than 60 calendar days after the privatizer submits its application to the commission, the commission shall determine in writing whether the application is complete and shall immediately transmit the determination to the privatizer.

(2) If the application is determined not to be complete, the commission shall specify in writing those parts of the application which are incomplete and shall indicate the manner in which it can be made complete, including a list and thorough description of the specific information needed to complete the application. The applicant shall submit materials to the commission in response to the list and description. Upon resubmittal of the application, a new 60-calendar-day period shall begin, during which the commission shall determine the completeness of the application.

(3) If the application is deemed complete, the commission may determine not later than 90 calendar days after the application is deemed complete that the privatization project is not a public utility within the meaning of Section 216 and is therefore exempt from commission regulation, if the commission finds that the application clearly complies with the criteria in subdivisions (d) and (e). If the commission does not make this finding, then it shall proceed under the schedule established in subdivision (c).

(4) If the commission fails to make a written determination as to the completeness of the application within 60 calendar days after receipt of the original or resubmitted application, the application shall be deemed complete for purposes of this section.

(c) Within 180 calendar days after the application is deemed complete, the commission shall determine whether the privatization project is a public utility within the meaning of Section 216 using the criteria in subdivisions (d) and (e). The commission may hold a hearing on the matter if the commission finds it to be necessary. No franchise, license, or service agreement between a privatizer and a local agency shall be entered into until the commission has either exempted the project or the 180-calendar-day period has expired, whichever comes first. Nothing in this section precludes a privatizer and the commission from mutually agreeing to a further extension of any time limit provided in this section.

(d) The commission may determine that a privatization project is not a public utility within the meaning of Section 216, and is therefore exempt from commission regulation if it finds that the franchise, license, or service agreement both demonstrates that the local agency retains sufficient jurisdiction to protect the public interest and adequately addresses all aspects of the provision of service which would otherwise be subject to commission regulation. In making its determination, the commission shall determine whether the local agency has complied with Section 54253 of the Government Code. The decision of the commission shall be final and conclusive in the absence of any subsequent changes.

(e) In making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c), the commission shall review the franchise, license, or service agreement to ensure that the agreement grants the local agency, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Exclusive authority to establish all rates and rate changes charged to the public.

(2) Approval over any proposal of the privatizer to provide new, additional, or alternative service to any other public or private entity or to change the service fee paid to the privatizer by the local agency.

(3) Approval over the original design and construction of the project, including any changes in design, alterations, or additions to the project.

(4) Approval over any changes in ownership of the party or parties subject to the franchise, license, or service agreement.

(5) Authority to impose fines and penalties for noncompliance with any provision of the executed franchise, license, or service agreement, or for failure to provide the service within the time period agreed to in the franchise, license, or service agreement.

(6) Authority to ensure that the facility is adequately maintained.

(7) Adequate opportunity to monitor compliance with the agreement and to ensure the project will be operated to meet any applicable federal or state water quality standards or other applicable laws.

(8) Adequate opportunity to amend the agreement in the event of unforeseen circumstances or contingencies, such as flood, earthquake, fire, or other natural disasters or federal tax law changes.

(f) The commission may adopt whatever procedures it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e). The commission shall adopt regulations for reviewing any proposed changes to a contingent franchise, license, or service agreement to determine if the proposed changes could render the project a public utility within the meaning of Section 216. The commission shall charge each privatizer submitting an application pursuant to this section a fee which will be sufficient to defray the costs incurred in processing the application and rendering a decision upon it.

(g) As used in this section, “privatization project” means any waste water or sewerage project that is owned and operated by a privatizer pursuant to a franchise, license, or service agreement with a local agency, or any agency of that local agency, pursuant to which services are supplied for the benefit of the local agency, its residents, or both, or any agency of the state. “Project” includes, but is not limited to, financing, designing, constructing, repairing, replacing, maintaining, and operating collector systems, pumping stations, treatment plants, and lateral interceptors, and outfall sewers. “Local agency” means any city, county, city and county, special district, or county service area. “Privatizer” means any corporation, partnership, or natural person, excluding municipal corporations, which owns and operates a wastewater or sewerage project pursuant to a franchise, license, or service agreement with a local agency. “Privatization project,” as used in this section, includes the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority’s Arlington Basin Groundwater Desalter Project, which will treat groundwater contaminated by wastewater.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 669, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10014.

The commission may enter into a contract with a local agency to provide any technical assistance needed to comply with Section 10013, if the contract includes provisions for the commission to be reimbursed for its estimated reasonable costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1430, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale and Disposal [10051. - 10061.]

10051.

Any municipal corporation incorporated under the laws of this State may as provided in this article sell and dispose of any public utility that it owns.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10052.

Whenever the legislative body of a municipal corporation by a resolution passed by two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest and necessity demand that any public utility owned by the municipal corporation should be sold, it may at any subsequent meeting by a vote of two-thirds of all its members order the proposition of selling the public utility to be submitted to the qualified voters of the municipal corporation at an election held for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10053.

The ordinance calling the special election shall recite the object for which the election is to be held, the purpose for which the proceeds of the sale are proposed to be expended, the manner of holding the election, and the manner of voting for or against the sale of the public utility. In all particulars not recited in the ordinance the election shall be held as provided for by law for holding municipal elections in such municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10054.

The ordinance shall be published once a day for at least 12 days in a newspaper published at least six days a week in the municipality or at least once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published less than six days a week in the municipality. The insertion each week for two succeeding weeks is a sufficient publication in a newspaper published less than six days a week. The first publication of the ordinance shall be at least two weeks prior to the date mentioned in the ordinance for holding the election. In municipalities where no such newspaper is published the ordinance shall be posted in three public places therein for two succeeding weeks next before the day fixed for the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10055.

The votes of two-thirds of all voters voting at the election are necessary to authorize the sale of the public utility described in the ordinance calling the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10056.

The resolution and ordinance may provide for the sale of more than one public utility, but in such case the question of selling each public utility shall be separately stated in the ordinance and upon the election ballots.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10057.

If the vote cast at the election is in favor of the sale of the public utility mentioned in the ordinance calling for the election, the legislative body of the municipal corporation shall immediately proceed to sell the public utility, and shall fix a date on which bids for the sale of the public utility will be received and the manner of filing bids. The legislative body shall cause notice of the sale to be published for at least two weeks next before the day fixed for receiving bids in the manner provided in Section 10054 for publication of the ordinance calling for the election. If no newspaper is published in the municipality, the notice shall be posted in three public places therein for two succeeding weeks next before the date fixed for receiving bids.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10058.

At the date fixed for receiving bids the legislative body of the municipal corporation shall open and examine all bids received and may sell the public utility to the highest and best bidder therefor. If the bids received, in the opinion of the legislative body are inadequate or disproportionate to the value of the public utility the legislative body may reject all bids and may proceed to give new notice of the sale of the public utility in the manner provided in Section 10057.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10059.

When a bid is accepted by the legislative body of the municipal corporation, the legislative body may by resolution authorize its mayor, or president of its board of trustees, or other chief executive officer, and its clerk to execute, acknowledge, and deliver on behalf of the municipal corporation, in its name and under its corporate seal, a deed conveying the public utility to the successful bidder upon receiving from him in cash the full amount of the bid and the promise of the bidder to continue to operate the public utility. The deed shall operate to convey to the successful bidder all of the municipality’s right, title, interest, and estate in and to the public utility described in the deed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10060.

The proceeds of the sale of the public utility shall be placed in the municipal treasury and shall be applied exclusively for the purposes and objects mentioned in the ordinance calling the election for the sale of the public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10061.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 10001) and this article, and except as provided in Section 37420.5 of the Government Code, a municipal corporation, by following the provisions of this section, may lease, sell, or transfer all or part of a public utility owned and operated by it for furnishing water or sewer service. As used in this section, “municipal
 corporation” means a city or a city and county.

(b) Any municipal corporation owning and operating a public utility for furnishing water or sewer service, a part of which or all of which public utility is operated and used for furnishing water or sewer service outside the boundaries of the municipal corporation, may lease, sell, or transfer, for just
 compensation, all or any part of the portion of the public utility located outside the boundaries of the municipal corporation to any other municipal corporation, public agency, water corporation, or sewer system corporation upon the terms and conditions agreed upon by the selling municipal corporation if, by resolution adopted by a majority of its legislative body, it has determined that the public utility, or portion thereof, is not necessary for supplying water or sewer service to its own inhabitants and if the acquiring entity by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of its legislative body or board of directors has concurred
 in the lease, sale, or transfer and the terms and conditions thereof and if the acquiring entity will be bound to render water or sewer service to the persons formerly served through the system being sold on terms and conditions that are just and reasonable and do not unreasonably discriminate against the customers of the acquired entity.

(c) Any municipal corporation owning and operating a public utility for furnishing water or sewer service may
 sell or transfer, for just compensation, all or any part of the public utility located inside its municipal boundaries to any other municipal corporation, public agency, water corporation, or sewer system corporation upon the terms and conditions agreed upon by the selling municipal corporation, if the sale or transfer is approved as follows:

(1) The municipal corporation, by resolution adopted by a majority of its legislative body, has determined that the public utility, or portion thereof, is not necessary for supplying water or sewer services to its own inhabitants, or that its inhabitants will be provided with equal or
 better service by the acquiring entity on terms that are just and reasonable and do not discriminate against the customers of the acquired entity, and orders the issue submitted to the qualified voters of the municipality at a special or general election held for that purpose.

(2) The acquiring entity by resolution adopted by a majority of its legislative body or board of directors has concurred in the sale or transfer and in the terms and conditions thereof.

(3) The sale or transfer is approved by a majority of all voters voting on the issue in the election held for that purpose.

(4) The municipal corporation, public
 agency, water corporation, or sewer system corporation proposing to acquire a municipal corporation public utility for furnishing water or sewer service shall disclose to the customers of the public water or sewer system to be acquired, not less than 30 days prior to the date of election for formal approval of the acquisition, a written statement which includes all of the following:

(A) A summary of the price and terms of the proposed acquisition.

(B) A
 comparison of the applicable water or sewer charges before and after the proposed acquisition.

(C) The estimated savings to be achieved or additional costs expected to result, or both, from the proposed acquisition.

(d) Subject to subdivision (e), a municipal corporation may lease a public utility furnishing water or sewer service by a resolution adopted by a majority of its legislative body and without lease term or other restrictions stated in any other law.

(e) A municipal corporation acting pursuant to
 subdivision (c) shall specify the manner of soliciting and filing, and the method of evaluating, proposals for the acquisition of the public utility. Upon receipt and staff evaluation of a proposal or proposals the municipal corporation, if it determines that the proposal or proposals are responsive, shall schedule a public hearing, and notice thereof shall be published in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code. At the hearing, the municipal corporation shall examine proposals received and staff recommendations, and without lease term or other restrictions, may lease, sell, or transfer, for just compensation, the public utility to the entity that the municipal corporation finds best qualified to continue to provide equal or better service to the customers of the system. If the resolution proposes a sale, the resolution shall place the question on the ballot at the next regularly scheduled election or at a special election called for that purpose. The municipal corporation may, in its sole
 discretion, reject all proposals.

(f) Any agreement entered into before September 17, 1965, between municipal corporations for the lease, sale, or transfer of all or any part of a public utility owned and operated by one of the municipal corporations and furnishing water service to the inhabitants of the municipal corporation to which the lease, sale, or transfer is made is hereby validated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 866, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 2339)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights of Way [10101. - 10107.]

10101.

There is granted to every municipal corporation of the State the right to construct, operate, and maintain water and gas pipes, mains and conduits, electric light and power lines, telephone and telegraph lines, sewers and sewer mains, all with the necessary appurtenances, across, along, in, under, over, or upon any road, street, alley, avenue, or highway, and across, under, or over any railway, canal, ditch, or flume which the route of such works intersects, crosses, or runs along, in such manner as to afford security for life and property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

A municipal corporation exercising its rights under this article shall restore the road, street, alley, avenue, highway, canal, ditch, or flume so used to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall locate its use so as to interfere as little as possible with other existing uses of a road, street, alley, avenue, highway, canal, ditch, or flume.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

Before any municipal corporation uses any street, alley, avenue, or highway within any other municipal corporation or county, it shall request of the municipal corporation or county that has control over the street, alley, avenue, or highway to agree with it upon the location of the use and the terms and conditions to which the use shall be subject.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   (AB 1119)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

If the two municipal corporations, or a municipal corporation and a county, are unable to agree on the terms and conditions and location of a use within three months after a proposal to do so, the municipal corporation proposing to use a street, alley, avenue, or highway may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the street, alley, avenue, or highway is situated against the other municipal corporation or the county to have the terms and conditions and location determined. The superior court may determine and adjudicate the terms and conditions to which the use of the
 street, avenue, alley, or highway shall be subject, and the location thereof, and upon the making of the final judgment the municipal corporation desiring to do so may enter and use the street, alley, avenue, or highway upon the terms and conditions and at the location specified in the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   (AB 1119)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.
